Washington statutes.
RCW 36.90.040

Fair deemed county and district fair and agricultural fair.

The southwest Washington fair shall be deemed a county and district fair for the purposes of chapter 15.76 RCW as well as an agricultural fair for the purpose of receiving allocations of funds under RCW 15.76.140 through 15.76.165.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 97 s 4; 1963 c 4 s 36.90.040. Prior: 1913 c 47 s 5; RRS s 2749.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 97: See note following RCW 36.90.010.